Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5135YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2091 Section 1. Section 714.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. For the purpose of obtaining employment 3 or other personal gain, falsely represents oneself as 4 possessing an academic degree or academic credentials. 5 Sec. 2. Section 714.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A fraudulent practice as set forth in 8 section 714.8, subsection 6A. 9